Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 3. Conduct of Trust Business by Banks.

§ 6.2-819.
Authority to engage in trust business; permission of Commission required.

A bank shall not engage in the trust business unless its articles of incorporation state that one of its purposes is to engage in the trust business.

A bank shall not commence to engage in the trust business without first obtaining permission from the Commission. The Commission shall not grant such permission unless it finds that:

The bank’s capital structure is sufficiently strong to support such additional undertaking;

The personnel who will direct the proposed trust department have adequate experience and training, and will devote sufficient time to its affairs to insure compliance with the law and to protect the bank against surcharge; and

The granting of trust powers to the bank will be in the public interest.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B, any bank actively engaged in the trust business on January 1, 1966, may continue in the trust business without the Commission’s permission.

A bank authorized to do a trust business shall conduct such business in accordance with the applicable provisions of Chapter 10 (§

6.2-1000

et seq.).

History.

Code 1950, § 6-91; 1958, c. 139; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-16; 1976, c. 658; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-820.
Powers of national banks as fiduciaries.

All national banks that have been, or hereafter may be, permitted by law to act as trustee and in other fiduciary capacities, shall have the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities conferred upon trust companies by Chapter 10 (§

6.2-1000

et seq.).

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-94, 6-104; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-17; 1984, c. 172; 1993, c. 432; 1997, c. 801; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-821.
Separation of banking and trust functions; establishment of trust department.

Every state bank that obtains permission from the Commission to engage in trust business shall establish a separate trust department. Such department shall be established before such institution undertakes to act in any fiduciary capacity and shall be placed under the management of an officer or officers whose duties shall be prescribed by the board of directors of the institution or by either an amendment to the bylaws of the institution or by a resolution duly entered in the minutes of the board of directors.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-97; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-20; 1993, c. 432; 2010, c. 794.